North Dakota, session 69, SB2206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 28-01-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
28-01-17. Actions having three-year limitations - Exceptions.
The following actions must be commenced within three years after the claim for relief has
accrued:
1. An action against a sheriff or coroner upon a liability incurred by the doing of an act in
the sheriff's or coroner's official capacity and by virtue of that office, or by the omission
of an official duty, including the nonpayment of money collected upon an execution.
However, this subsection does not apply to an action for an escape.
2. An action upon a statute for a penalty or forfeiture, if the action is given to the party
aggrieved, or to such party and the state, unless the statute imposing it prescribes a
different limitation.
3. An action for the foreclosure of a construction lien.
4. An action against an employer for an injury to or the death of an individual, other than
the owner or operator, occurring during the operation of a commercial motor vehicle.
Page No. 1 25.0285.04000